Missouri, session 2026, SB1246.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 563.016 and 563.031, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 563.031 and 563.085, to read as follows:
563.031. 1. A person may, subject to the provisions
of subsection 2 of this section, use physical force upon
another person when and to the extent he or she reasonably
believes such force to be necessary to defend himself or
herself or a third person from what he or she reasonably
believes to be the use or imminent use of unlawful force by
such other person, unless:
(1) The actor was the initial aggressor; except that
in such case his or her use of force is nevertheless
justifiable provided:
(a) He or she has withdrawn from the encounter and
effectively communicated such withdrawal to such other
person but the latter persists in continuing the incident by
the use or threatened use of unlawful force; or
(b) He or she is a law enforcement officer and as such
is an aggressor pursuant to section 563.046; or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1246 2
(c) The aggressor is justified under some other
provision of this chapter or other provision of law;
(2) Under the circumstances as the actor reasonably
believes them to be, the person whom he or she seeks to
protect would not be justified in using such protective
force;
(3) The actor was attempting to commit, committing, or
escaping after the commission of a forcible felony.
2. A person shall not use deadly force upon another
person under the circumstances specified in subsection 1 of
this section unless:
(1) He or she reasonably believes that such deadly
force is necessary to protect himself, or herself or her
unborn child, or another against death, serious physical
injury, or any forcible felony;
(2) Such force is used against a person who unlawfully
enters, remains after unlawfully entering, or attempts to
unlawfully enter a dwelling, residence, or vehicle lawfully
occupied by such person; or
(3) Such force is used against a person who unlawfully
enters, remains after unlawfully entering, or attempts to
unlawfully enter private property that is owned or leased by
an individual, or is occupied by an individual who has been
given specific authority by the property owner to occupy the
property, claiming a justification of using protective force
under this section.
3. A person does not have a duty to retreat:
(1) From a dwelling, residence, or vehicle where the
person is not unlawfully entering or unlawfully remaining;
(2) From private property that is owned or leased by
such individual; or

SB 1246 3
(3) If the person is in any other location such person
has the right to be.
4. The justification afforded by this section extends
to the use of physical restraint as protective force
provided that the actor takes all reasonable measures to
terminate the restraint as soon as it is reasonable to do so.
5. [The defendant shall have the burden of injecting
the issue of justification under this section. If a
defendant asserts that his or her use of force is described
under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section, the
burden shall then be on the state to prove beyond a
reasonable doubt that the defendant did not reasonably
believe that the use of such force was necessary to defend
against what he or she reasonably believed was the use or
imminent use of unlawful force] There shall be a presumption
of reasonableness under this section that the defendant
believed such force was necessary to defend himself or
herself or a third person from what he or she believed to be
the use or imminent use of unlawful force by another person.
563.085. 1. A person who uses or threatens to use
force pursuant to section 563.031 is justified in such
conduct and is immune from criminal prosecution and civil
action for the use or threatened use of such force by the
person, personal representative, or heirs of the person
against whom the force was used or threatened, unless the
person against whom force was used or threatened is a law
enforcement officer who was acting in the performance of his
or her official duties and the officer identified himself or
herself in accordance with any applicable law or the person
using or threatening to use force knew or reasonably should
have known that the person was a law enforcement officer.
As used in this subsection, the term "criminal prosecution"

SB 1246 4
includes arresting, detaining in custody, and charging or
prosecuting the defendant.
2. A law enforcement agency may use standard
procedures for investigating the use or threatened use of
force as described in subsection 1 of this section, but the
agency may not arrest the person for using or threatening to
use force unless the agency determines that there is
probable cause that the force that was used or threatened
was unlawful.
3. In a criminal prosecution or civil action, once a
prima facie claim of self-defense immunity has been raised
by the defendant at a pretrial immunity hearing, the burden
of proof by clear and convincing evidence is on the party
seeking to overcome the immunity provided in subsection 1 of
this section.
[563.016. The fact that conduct is
justified under this chapter does not abolish or
impair any remedy for such conduct which is
available in any civil actions.]
✓